Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.461

Grain indemnity fund program—Payment of claims—Restrictions, priority.

The requirement that the state of Washington pay claims under this chapter only exists so long as the grain indemnity fund contains sufficient money to pay the claims. Under no circumstances whatsoever may any funds (other than assessment amounts and other money obtained under this chapter) be used to pay claims. In the event that the amount in the grain indemnity fund is insufficient to pay all approved claims in the amount provided for under RCW 22.09.451 or 22.09.456, the claims shall be paid in the order in which they were filed with the department, until such time as sufficient moneys are available in the grain indemnity fund to pay all of the claims.

[ 1987 c 509 s 18.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 509: See note following RCW 22.09.060.